Colorado, session 2026A, SB083.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Extension of rules scheduled for expiration May
15, 2026. (1) The expiration of all rules of agencies in the following
principal departments, which rules were adopted or amended on or after
November 1, 2024, and before November 1, 2025, and that are therefore
scheduled for expiration May 15, 2026, is postponed:
(a) Department of agriculture;
(b) Department of corrections;
(c) Department of early childhood;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(d) Department of education;
(e) Department of health care policy and financing;
(f) Department of higher education;
(g) Department of human services;
(h) Department of labor and employment;
(i) Department of law;
(j) Department of local affairs;
(k) Department of military and veterans affairs;
(l) Department of natural resources;
(m) Department of personnel;
(n) Department of public health and environment;
(o) Department of public safety;
(p) Department of regulatory agencies;
(q) Department of revenue;
(r) Department of state;
(s) Department of transportation; and
(t) Department of the treasury.
(2) The expiration of all rules of the public employees' retirement
association, which rules were adopted or amended on or after November 1,
2024, and before November 1, 2025, and which are therefore scheduled for
expiration May 15, 2026, is postponed.
(3) The expiration of all rules of the board of equalization, which
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-083

rules were adopted or amended on or after November 1, 2024, and before
November 1, 2025, and which are therefore scheduled for expiration May
15, 2026, is postponed.
(4) The recommendations of the committee on legal services as
reflected in this act apply to the specified rules in the form in which the
rules were considered and acted upon by the committee. Any amendments
or other changes in the specified rules that became effective before
November 1, 2025, that comply with the recommendations of the committee
on legal services are not affected by this act. Any subsequent amendments
or other changes in the specified rules that became effective on or after
November 1, 2025, are not affected by this act.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-083

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-083